Massachusetts, session 194th, S2459.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 33 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
section 67B the following section:-  
Section 67C. There shall be a Massachusetts orange heart medal to be presented to a 
service member or veteran who suffered a service-connected disease, condition or injury related 
to the exposure to harmful toxins, herbicides, agents or materials including, but not limited to, 
exposure to agent orange and burn pits, where the exposure occurred while serving in the armed 
forces of the United States, active or reserve components, or the Massachusetts national guard. A 
service member shall have entered military service or state active duty from the commonwealth, 
have been a resident of the commonwealth at the time of death or have been a member of the 
Massachusetts national guard at the time of death. To be eligible, a service member or veteran 
must have served after December 6, 1941. The adjutant general or designee and 2 field grade 
officers of the armed forces of the commonwealth detailed by the commander-in-chief shall 

of 5 13 constitute a commission to make recommendations to the commander-in-chief for the awarding 
of the Massachusetts orange heart medal. The presentation of the Massachusetts orange heart 
medal pursuant to this section shall not preclude an award of the Massachusetts medal of fidelity 
pursuant to section 67B.  
SECTION 2. Chapter 115 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the 
following section:-  
Section 18. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following words shall, unless the 
context clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:  
"Agent orange", the herbicide composed primarily of trichlorophenoxyacetic acid (2, 4, 5 
T) and dichlorophenoxyacetic acid (2, 4 D) and its contaminant tetrachlorodibenzo-para-dioxin 
(2, 3, 7, 8 dioxin, TCDD).  
"Chemical agent", dioxin or other toxic substances found in certain defoliants, herbicides, 
pesticides and similar chemical substances or causative agents.  
"Board", the veterans agent orange advisory board.  
"Program", the agent orange information and assistance program.  
“Vietnam veteran”, as defined in clause Forty-third of section 7 of chapter 4 of the 
General Laws.  
(b) There shall be a veterans agent orange advisory board to assist the secretary in 
administering the agent orange and burn pit information and assistance program established 
pursuant to subsection (c). The board shall consist of: 3 members appointed by the secretary of 
veterans' services; and 2 members appointed by the governor. All members shall, by education or 

of 5 34 experience, be knowledgeable of veterans benefits and programs and have demonstrated interest 
in veteran affairs. A majority of the members shall be veterans. Members shall serve for 5 years. 
The members shall vote to select a chair. If a vacancy occurs, it shall be filled for the balance of 
the unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointment. A majority of the appointed 
and serving members of the board shall constitute a quorum of the board for the transaction of 
business. An action of the board shall be approved by a majority vote of the members present at 
a meeting where a quorum is present. The members of the board shall serve without 
compensation.  
(c) The secretary shall develop and administer, in consultation with the veterans agent 
orange advisory board established in subsection (b), the agent orange information and assistance 
program to identify and assist Vietnam, Gulf War and Post September 11 veterans exposed to 
agent orange or other chemical agents in connection with their military service. The program 
shall:  
(1) study, evaluate and provide information regarding epidemiological, genetic and other 
studies, investigations and research that pertain to use of chemical agents, including agent 
orange, and adverse health conditions that may be associated with exposure to chemical agents;  
(2) provide medical information to health professionals in the commonwealth regarding 
the detection, diagnosis and treatment of acute and chronic symptoms that may be associated 
with exposure to chemical agents, including agent orange;  
(3) monitor and report on the activities and policies of the federal government and other 
states relating to the exposure of veterans to chemical agents, including agent orange;  

of 5 55  (4) monitor existing programs for Vietnam, Gulf War and Post September 11 veterans at 
the state or local level to determine if adequate services and resources exist, identify additional 
areas of concern and make recommendations on behalf of Vietnam, Gulf War and Post 
September 11 veterans to address these needs;  
(5) provide genetic information, screening and counseling to Vietnam, Gulf War and Post 
September 11 veterans regarding the possible genetic effects which may be associated with 
exposure to chemical agents, including agent orange;  
(6) establish, promote and maintain a public information service on agent orange 
including, but not limited to, efforts to contact Vietnam, Gulf War and Post September 11 
veterans who may have been exposed to agent orange or other chemical agents;  
(7) establish and maintain a central registry of information on Vietnam, Gulf War and 
Post September 11 veterans in the commonwealth who may have been exposed to agent orange 
or other chemical substances;  
(8) refer Vietnam, Gulf War and Post September 11 veterans to appropriate state and 
federal agencies or other available resources for treatment of adverse health conditions which 
may have resulted from possible exposure to chemical agents, including agent orange, in 
connection with their military service;  
(9) assist Vietnam, Gulf War and Post September 11  veterans in filing compensation 
claims for disabilities that may have resulted from possible exposure to chemical agents, 
including agent orange and burn pits; and  

of 5 75  (10) communicate the concerns of Vietnam, Gulf War and Post September 11 veterans 
related to exposure to chemical agents, including agent orange and burn pits, to appropriate state 
and federal officials.  
(d) The secretary, in consultation with the board, shall promulgate regulations necessary 
to implement this section.